Utah statutes.
63C-12-108.   Research team duties.
The research team shall:
(1)  compile existing scientific research baseline data on the potential
impact of the use of water resources in the interstate groundwater flow system
specified in the Lincoln County Conservation, Recreation, and Development Act
of 2004, Pub. L. No. 108-424, including the impact on:
(a)  surface water and groundwater;
(b)  vegetation, including invasive species;
(c)  agriculture;
(d)  soils;
(e)  air quality;
(f)  wildlife;
(g)  the geologic integrity of the aquifer; and
(h)  socioeconomic conditions;
(2)  compile changes to the baseline data compiled under Subsection (1);
(3)  seek to enter into cooperative agreements with governmental entities to
share relevant data and information;
(4)  provide an annual data and information report to the council; and
(5)  seek the voluntary participation of experts in academia and the private
sector in the activities of the research team.
